src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Sakirabiá language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
õt+Pron+Pers+Sg1:õ%{tr%}  Cases "I/eu" ;
ẽt+Pron+Pers+Sg2:ẽ%{tr%}  Cases "you(sg)/" ;
te+Pron+Pers+Sg3:te    Cases   ;
sete+Pron+Pers+Sg3c:sete    Cases   ;
õt+Pron+Pers+Pl1Incl:kise    Cases   ;
õt+Pron+Pers+Pl13:ose    Cases   ;
ẽt+Pron+Pers+Pl2:eya%{tr%}    Cases   ;
te+Pron+Pers+Pl3:teya%{tr%}    Cases   ;
sete+Pron+Pers+Pl3c:seteya%{tr%}    Cases   ;

! what is a reflexive pronoun?
!Galucio 2001: 40
!jmr:2025-03-26:Do these words ever take other case forms?
õrẽp+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Nom:õrẽp  # "I/eu" ;
ẽrẽp+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Nom:ẽrẽp  # "you(sg)/" ;
teẽp+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Nom:teẽp    #   ;
seteẽp+Pron+Refl+Sg3c+Nom:seteẽp    #   ;
õrẽp+Pron+Refl+Pl1Incl+Nom:kiseẽp    #   ;
õrẽp+Pron+Refl+Pl13+Nom:oseẽp    #   ;
ẽrẽp+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Nom:eyarẽp    #   ;
teẽp+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Nom:teyarẽp    #   ;
seteẽp+Pron+Refl+Pl3c+Nom:seteyarẽp    #   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
